District of Columbia statutes.
22-4507

Certain sales of pistols prohibited.

No person shall within the District of Columbia sell any pistol to a person who he or she has reasonable cause to believe is not of sound mind, or is forbidden by § 22-4503 to possess a pistol [now “firearm”], or, except when the relation of parent and child or guardian and ward exists, is under the age of 21 years.

History

July 8, 1932, 47 Stat. 652, ch. 465, § 7
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 94, ch. 159, § 204(d)
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 15(f), 41 DCR 1639

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3207.
1973 Ed., § 22-3207.